test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vaalja_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - vaaljâ:
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaljâ
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaaljâ
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaaljâ
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaaljân
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaaljâst
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Com: valjáin
    vaaljâ+N+Sg+Abe: valjâttáá
    vaaljâ+N+Ess: vaaljân
    vaaljâ+N+Par: vaaljâd
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaaljah
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaaljâi, valjâi]
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaaljâid
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Ill: valjáid
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaaljâin
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Com: [valjâiguin, valjâiguin]
    vaaljâ+N+Pl+Abe: valjâittáá
